Maryland, session 2025, HB0689.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–244.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PROVIDER” MEANS A SCHOOL AUDIOLOGIST, SCHOOL
PSYCHOLOGIST, SCHOOL SPEECH PATHOLOGIST, AND ANY OTHER HEALTH CARE
PRACTITIONER WHO PROVIDES SERVICES TO A STUDENT IN A SCHOOL SETTING.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0689*

HOUSE BILL 689
(3) “REIMBURSEMENT FUNDS” MEANS FUNDS RECEIVED BY AN
ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL, OR A COUNTY SCHOOL SYSTEM, FOR
SERVICES PROVIDED IN A SCHOOL SETTING TO AN INDIVIDUAL ENROLLED IN THE
MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM OR THE MARYLAND CHILDREN’S
HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM.
(B) AN ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL OR A COUNTY SCHOOL
SYSTEM SHALL USE REIMBURSEMENT FUNDS TO PROVIDE:
(1) ADDITIONAL POSITIONS FOR PROVIDERS;
(2) PAID INTERNSHIPS FOR STUDENTS SEEKING TO BECOME
PROVIDERS;
(3) STIPENDS FOR PROVIDERS THAT ARE DESIGNED TO ADDRESS
PROBLEMS IN PROVIDER RECRUITMENT AND RETENTION; AND
(4) STIPENDS FOR PROVIDERS WORKING IN LOW–PERFORMING
SCHOOLS THAT ARE DESIGNED TO ADDRESS PROBLEMS IN PROVIDER RECRUITMENT
AND RETENTION.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.